New York, session 2025-2026, S520.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2404-e to read as follows: 3 § 2404-e. Ovarian cancer; right to screenings. No person with a 4 personal history of ovarian cancer shall be denied genetic testing or 5 genomic tumor profiling for inherited germline mutations and acquired 6 somatic mutations, respectively. In general, such testing shall not be 7 subject to frequency caps or other limitations and shall include, but 8 not be limited to: 9 (a) genetic mutations in BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes; 10 (b) genetic mutations associated with Lynch syndrome; 11 (c) rearrangement analysis of all coding exons associated with ovarian 12 cancer; and 13 (d) additional mutations if medically necessary and appropriate, as 14 determined by the health care professional treating the individual. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02193-01-5